test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-putma54_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - putma: # Verb (54) '/(eng) to touch /(fin) koskettaa' - partial paradigm
     putma+V+Inf/mA: putma
     putma+V+Inf: puttuq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: putu
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [putut, putudõq]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: putus
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: putumiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pututiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: putusõq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: putu
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: putuda
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [pututat, pututadõq]
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pututas
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pututamiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pututatiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pututasõq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: putuda
			
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [puttõ, putsõ]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [puttõt, puttõq, putsõt, putsõq]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [puttõ, putsõ]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [puttõmiq, putsõmiq]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [puttõtiq, putsõtiq]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [puttõq, puttõvaq, putsõq, putsõvaq]
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: putu
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: putudi
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [pututit, putudiq]
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pututi
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pututimiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pututitiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [putudiq, pututivaq]
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: putuda

     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: putva
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: putva
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: putvat
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: putvahe
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: putvaq
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: putvidõ
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: putvit
     putma+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: putvihe
                    
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pututav
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pututava
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Par: pututavat
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pututavahe
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pututavaq
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: pututavidõ
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Par: pututavit
     putma+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: pututavihe

     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: putnuq
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: putnu
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Par: putnut
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: putnuhe
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: putnuq
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [putnuidõ, putnuisi]
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [putnuid, putnuisi]
     putma+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [putnuihe, putnuisihe]

     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: [putut, pututu]
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: putudu
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Par: pututut
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: pututuhe
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: putuduq
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [pututuidõ, pututuisi]
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [pututuid, pututuisi]
     putma+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [pututuihe, pututuisihe]

     putma+V+Act+Jus: putkuq
